Colorado, session 2026A, HB1081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Colorado
Grid Optimization Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Both in-state and regional electric transmission systems are
essential to maintaining grid reliability and resilience amid unprecedented
load growth. As new transmission projects undergo lengthy planning,
permitting, and review processes, commercially available and proven
advanced transmission technologies present near-term opportunities to
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

accelerate the interconnection of new resources, maximize the performance
of existing transmission assets, and deliver least-cost energy to consumers.
(b) Advanced transmission technologies are technologies that
increase the capacity, efficiency, reliability, or resiliency of a transmission
facility and have the potential to optimize the transmission grid by lowering
costs, reducing congestion, and expediting the interconnection of new load;
(c) Advanced transmission technologies have been shown to
complement transmission expansion by optimizing the cost, utilization, and
value of new transmission build-out. When planned in tandem with
proposed new transmission facilities, these technologies can alleviate
transmission constraints, improve system efficiency, inform more strategic
siting and sequencing of infrastructure, and support broader benefits for
customers, landowners, wildlife, and disproportionately impacted
communities.
(d) National analyses, the federal energy regulatory commission, and
various state utility commissions have identified advanced transmission
technologies as cost-effective tools that can be deployed on faster timelines
than new transmission construction, thereby supporting near-term reliability
and job creation while mitigating rate impacts for customers;
(e) Strategic use of advanced transmission technologies also has the
potential to reduce wildfire risk and prevent power outages during
emergencies by improving real-time situational awareness and reducing
stress on existing transmission lines under extreme conditions;
(f) Integrating advanced transmission technologies into relevant
transmission planning processes and decision-making can support
Colorado's long-term energy affordability and grid modernization efforts by
making sufficient information available to regulators and the public
regarding where such technologies can deliver system-wide and customer
benefits;
(g) The Colorado electric transmission authority, referred to in this
section as the "authority", was created by Senate Bill 21-072 to enable the
expansion and financing of electric transmission facilities and infrastructure
and has since helped advance the state's clean energy goals and reliability
with an interregional focus. Additionally, Senate Bill 23-016 required the
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

authority to conduct a transmission capacity expansion study to assess the
need for expanded transmission capacity in the state.
(h) It is in the state's best interest to have coordinated statewide
transmission planning, and there is great potential value in the authority
providing leadership in regional transmission coordination and interregional
project development, including by supporting the advancement of priority
projects through joint studies and the facilitation of multi-utility and grid
operator collaboration where appropriate; and
(i) Regional planning groups, along with the authority, can provide
the state with a dedicated venue to coordinate interregional transmission
needs and advocate for equitable cost allocation and public policy alignment
in regional transmission organization governance structures.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-42-102, add (1.3),
(1.5), and (12.5) as follows:
40-42-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 42, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1.3) "ADVANCED CONDUCTOR" MEANS A CONDUCTOR TECHNOLOGY
USED IN AN ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION SYSTEM THAT, WHEN COMPARED TO AN
ALUMINUM CONDUCTOR STEEL REINFORCED CONDUCTOR OF THE SAME
DIAMETER, PLUS OR MINUS ONE PERCENT:
(a) HAS A DIRECT CURRENT ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE, MEASURED AT
A STANDARD REFERENCE TEMPERATURE OF TWENTY DEGREES CELSIUS
CONSISTENT WITH INDUSTRY PRACTICE, THAT IS AT LEAST FIFTEEN PERCENT
LOWER OR MEETS HIGHER PERFORMANCE STANDARDS RECOGNIZED BY THE
COMMISSION TO ACCOUNT FOR EVOLVING TECHNOLOGIES OR TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM NEEDS; AND
(b) INCREASES THE POTENTIAL ENERGY CARRYING CAPACITY BY AT
LEAST SIXTY PERCENT OR MEETS HIGHER PERFORMANCE STANDARDS
RECOGNIZED BY THE COMMISSION TO ACCOUNT FOR EVOLVING
TECHNOLOGIES OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM NEEDS.
(1.5) "ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES" MEANS
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

HARDWARE OR SOFTWARE TECHNOLOGIES THAT INCREASE THE CAPACITY,
EFFICIENCY, RELIABILITY, OR RESILIENCY OF AN EXISTING OR NEW
TRANSMISSION FACILITY, INCLUDING:
(a) ADVANCED CONDUCTORS; AND
(b) GRID-ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES.
(12.5) "GRID-ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY" MEANS A HARDWARE OR
SOFTWARE TECHNOLOGY THAT REDUCES CONGESTION OR ENHANCES THE
FLEXIBILITY OF ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS BY
INCREASING THE CAPACITY OF A TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION LINE, OR
BY REROUTING ELECTRICITY FROM OVERLOADED LINES TO UNCONGESTED
LINES, WHILE MAINTAINING INDUSTRY SAFETY STANDARDS.
"GRID-ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY" INCLUDES:
(a) DYNAMIC LINE RATINGS;
(b) ADVANCED POWER FLOW CONTROLLERS;
(c) TOPOLOGY OPTIMIZATION;
(d) ENERGY STORAGE, INCLUDING ANY TYPE OF MOBILE OR
RELOCATABLE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM, WHEN USED AS A TRANSMISSION
OR DISTRIBUTION RESOURCE; AND
(e) OTHER TECHNOLOGIES THAT INCREASE GRID RELIABILITY,
FLEXIBILITY, AND CAPACITY.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-2-126, amend (6);
and add (7), (8), and (9) as follows:
40-2-126. Transmission facilities - biennial review - energy
resource zones - plans - approval - cost recovery - powerline trail
consideration - rules - definitions.
(6) The commission shall amend its rules requiring the filing of
ten-year transmission plans by utilities to also require utilities to:
(a) Consider and address plans for the construction of new
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

powerline trails in coordination with applicable local governments in each
two-year update to a ten-year transmission plan; and
(b) Demonstrate compliance with section 33-45-103 (2);
(c) FOR UTILITIES SUBJECT TO RATE REGULATION BY THE
COMMISSION, IDENTIFY STRATEGIES TO REDUCE THE COSTS OF
CONSTRUCTION AND OBTAINING ADEQUATE FINANCING FOR IDENTIFIED
PROJECTS IN THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN, INCLUDING BY
CONSIDERING, AFTER EVALUATING WHETHER APPLICABLE, THE USE OF
BONDS ISSUED BY THE COLORADO ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AUTHORITY
PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-42-104 (1)(r). IF A UTILITY IDENTIFIES OR
EVALUATES THE POTENTIAL USE OF BONDS ISSUED BY THE COLORADO
ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AUTHORITY AS A COST-REDUCTION STRATEGY IN
THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN, THE UTILITY SHALL CONSULT
WITH THE COLORADO ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION AUTHORITY PRIOR TO FILING
THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN.
(d) INCORPORATE, IN THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN,
AN EVALUATION OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 40-42-102 (1.5), WHICH EVALUATION MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A TECHNICAL FEASIBILITY ASSESSMENT;
(II) IF TECHNICALLY FEASIBLE, A COST-EFFECTIVENESS ANALYSIS
AND TIMETABLE FOR POTENTIAL DEPLOYMENT;
(III) AN ASSESSMENT OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES
ABLE TO REDUCE OR MITIGATE TRANSMISSION SYSTEM NEEDS WITH THE
POTENTIAL TO ACHIEVE THE FOLLOWING, AS APPLICABLE:
(A) AN INCREASE IN TRANSMISSION SYSTEM CAPACITY,
COST-EFFECTIVENESS, RELIABILITY, OR RESILIENCY;
(B) A REDUCTION OF TRANSMISSION SYSTEM CONGESTION;
(C) A REDUCTION IN THE TIMELINE TO CONNECT NEW GENERATION
OR LOAD TO THE GRID;
(D) A REDUCTION OF THE RISK OF IGNITING WILDFIRES;
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

(E) AN INCREASE IN CAPACITY TO CONNECT NEW RENEWABLE
ENERGY AND CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCES REFLECTING THE UTILITY'S
GENERATION AND LOAD PLANNING FORECASTS FROM THE UTILITY'S MOST
RECENT ELECTRIC RESOURCE PLAN; OR
(F) AN INCREASE IN THE TRANSFER CAPABILITY OF ELECTRICITY
BETWEEN COLORADO AND NEIGHBORING STATES;
(IV) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY ADDITIONAL POTENTIAL BENEFITS OF
DEPLOYING ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES, WHICH BENEFITS
MAY INCLUDE:
(A) THE ABILITY TO MEET SHORT-TERM TRANSMISSION NEEDS WHILE
NEW TRANSMISSION IS BEING SITED, PERMITTED, OR CONSTRUCTED; AND
(B) A REDUCTION IN IMPACTS TO HIGH-PRIORITY HABITATS, WILDLIFE
MOVEMENT CORRIDORS AND CROSSINGS, AND SPECIES OF GREATEST
CONSERVATION NEED, AS IDENTIFIED BY THE DIVISION OF PARKS AND
WILDLIFE CREATED IN SECTION 33-9-104; AND
(V) IF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES ARE FOUND TO
OFFER A MORE COST-EFFECTIVE STRATEGY TO ACHIEVE THE GOALS LISTED
IN SUBSECTION (6)(d)(III) OF THIS SECTION, WHETHER IN COMBINATION WITH
OR INSTEAD OF OTHER CAPITAL INVESTMENTS, BUT ARE NOT INCORPORATED
INTO THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN, A DETAILED
EXPLANATION, INCLUDING RELEVANT ANALYSES, SUBMITTED TO THE
COMMISSION AS PART OF THE UTILITY'S TEN-YEAR TRANSMISSION PLAN AND
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES EVALUATION, EXPLAINING WHY
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES SHOULD NOT BE DEPLOYED TO
MEET A SPECIFIC NEED OR IN LIEU OF ANOTHER PROJECT.
(7) AN IDENTIFICATION OF A WILDFIRE-RELATED BENEFIT AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (6)(d)(III)(D) OF THIS SECTION IN AN
ASSESSMENT OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES CONDUCTED BY
A UTILITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(d)(III) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT
TRIGGER A SEPARATE COMMISSION APPROVAL PROCESS. THE COMMISSION
MAY CONSIDER THE IDENTIFIED WILDFIRE-RELATED BENEFIT DURING THE
COMMISSION'S REVIEW OF THE UTILITY'S NEXT WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN
FILING OR A FUTURE CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
FILED BY THE UTILITY.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

(8) NOTHING IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION PRECLUDES THE
EVALUATION OF OTHER TECHNOLOGIES OR DEVICES THAT ENHANCE THE
RELIABILITY, RESILIENCE, OR PROTECTION OF THE ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION
SYSTEM, INCLUDING BY IMPROVING THE STABILITY OF EXISTING
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE.
(9) (a) IN AMENDING ITS RULES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL SEEK TO MINIMIZE DUPLICATION OF
TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES, TECHNICAL STUDIES, OR ANALYSES
CONDUCTED THROUGH AN APPLICABLE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION
ORGANIZATION OR INDEPENDENT SYSTEM OPERATOR. IN DOING SO, THE
COMMISSION MAY ALLOW A UTILITY TO REFERENCE AND INCORPORATE
ANALYSES CONDUCTED THROUGH AN APPLICABLE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION
ORGANIZATION OR INDEPENDENT SYSTEM OPERATOR, AS APPROPRIATE, AND
TO RELY ON THESE ANALYSES TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION TO THE EXTENT THAT THE ANALYSES ADDRESS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A UTILITY RELYING ON ANALYSES CONDUCTED THROUGH AN
APPLICABLE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION OR INDEPENDENT
SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL IDENTIFY IN THE UTILITY'S FILING THE SECTION OF
EACH ANALYSIS THAT ADDRESSES THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES EVALUATION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION
(6)(d) OF THIS SECTION AND THE RELEVANCE OF THE ANALYSIS TO THOSE
REQUIREMENTS.
(c) PARTICIPATION IN A REGIONAL TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESS
DOES NOT BY ITSELF SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF COMMISSION RULES
AMENDED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-42-104, add (10) as
follows:
40-42-104. General and specific powers and duties of the
authority.
(10) IN CONDUCTING ITS DUTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE
42, THE AUTHORITY SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, ENGAGE AND
COORDINATE WITH FORMAL SUBREGIONAL TRANSMISSION PLANNING
ORGANIZATIONS.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 40-42-108 as
follows:
40-42-108. Report to general assembly.
Commencing in 2022, the authority shall submit a report of its
activities to the energy and environment committee of the house of
representatives and the transportation and energy committee of the senate,
or any successor committees, not later than December 1 JANUARY 31 of
each year. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial
statement covering the operations of the authority for the previous state
fiscal year AND A DESCRIPTION OF THE ACTIVITIES AND ACCOMPLISHMENTS
OF THE AUTHORITY DURING THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR.
Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the
report continues indefinitely.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-42-103, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
40-42-103. Authority - creation - board - open meetings and
open records.
(2) (a) The powers of the authority are vested in a board of directors,
which consists of the following nine TEN members:
(I) Two members appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate;
(II) The director of the Colorado energy office created in section
24-38.5-101 or the director's designee;
(III) Three members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(IV) Three members appointed by the president of the senate; AND
(V) THE DIRECTOR OF THE COMMISSION OR THE DIRECTOR'S
DESIGNEE, WHO IS A NONVOTING EX OFFICIO MEMBER.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-92-303, amend (1)
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

and (5)(b)(II)(C); and add (1.5) as follows:
24-92-303. Definitions.
As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Construction" means the construction, alteration, or repair of an
energy sector public works project, consistent with and including the same
limitations as the definition of construction as established in section 45
(b)(7)(a) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and
as described in all related official guidance from the federal internal
revenue service and the United States department of labor implementing the
applicable sections of the federal "Inflation Reduction Act". "ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
40-42-102 (1.5).
(1.5) "CONSTRUCTION" MEANS THE CONSTRUCTION, ALTERATION, OR
REPAIR OF AN ENERGY SECTOR PUBLIC WORKS PROJECT, CONSISTENT WITH
AND INCLUDING THE SAME LIMITATIONS AS THE DEFINITION OF
CONSTRUCTION AS ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 45 (b)(7)(a) OF THE FEDERAL
"INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986", AS AMENDED, AND AS DESCRIBED IN
ALL RELATED OFFICIAL GUIDANCE FROM THE FEDERAL INTERNAL REVENUE
SERVICE AND THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR IMPLEMENTING
THE APPLICABLE SECTIONS OF THE FEDERAL "INFLATION REDUCTION ACT".
(5) (b) "Energy sector public works project" includes the following
project types, so long as they satisfy the criteria in subsection (5)(a)(I) or
(5)(a)(II) of this section:
(II) Other projects with a total project cost of one million dollars or
more that include:
(C) Electric transmission projects, INCLUDING PROJECTS THAT
INCLUDE ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-92-304, add (6) as
follows:
24-92-304. Energy sector public works projects - craft labor
employment - training - wage requirements.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

(6) (a) AN ENERGY SECTOR PUBLIC WORKS PROJECT THAT INCLUDES
ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES MUST MEET THE PREVAILING
WAGE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN THIS PART 3 AND THE APPRENTICESHIP
UTILIZATION REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SECTION 24-92-115.
(b) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 92 APPLIES TO A PROJECT THAT
INCLUDES ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES, WHICH PROJECT DOES
NOT REQUIRE UTILITY LINE CONSTRUCTION WORK PERFORMED BY A
JOURNEYMAN LINEWORKER OR PROPERLY SUPERVISED APPRENTICE, SUCH AS
A SOFTWARE UPGRADE OR SMALL INSTALLATION THAT DOES NOT MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR AN ENERGY SECTOR PUBLIC WORKS PROJECT.
SECTION 10. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1081

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1081